Washington statutes.
RCW 2.70.030

Advisory committee—Membership—Duties—Travel and other expenses.

(1) There is created an advisory committee consisting of the following members:

(a) Three persons appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court, who shall also appoint the chair of the committee;

(b) Two nonattorneys appointed by the governor;

(c) Two senators, one from each of the two largest caucuses, appointed by the president of the senate; and two members of the house of representatives, one from each of the two largest caucuses, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(d) One person appointed by the court of appeals executive committee;

(e) One person appointed by the Washington state bar association;

(f) One person appointed by the Washington state association of counties; and

(g) One person appointed by the association of Washington cities.

(2) During the term of his or her appointment, no appointee may: (a) Provide indigent defense services funded by a city, a county, or the state, except on a pro bono basis; (b) serve as a judge except on a pro tem basis or as a court employee; or (c) serve as a prosecutor or prosecutor employee.

(3) Members of the advisory committee shall receive no compensation for their services as members of the committee, but may be reimbursed for travel and other expenses in accordance with state law.

(4) The advisory committee shall:

(a) Meet at least quarterly;

(b) Review at least biennially the performance of the director, and submit each review to the chief justice of the supreme court;

(c) Receive reports from the director;

(d) Make policy recommendations, as appropriate, to the legislature and the supreme court;

(e) Approve the office's budget requests;

(f) Advise the director regarding administration and oversight of the office's program areas; and

(g) Carry out other duties as authorized or required by law.

[ 2008 c 313 s 5; 2005 c 111 s 1; 1996 c 221 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 313: See note following RCW 2.70.005.